Connecticut, session 2026, SB00249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 1-110 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 1-110 to 1-110d, inclusive:
(1) "Public official" means public official, as defined in section 1-79, a
judge of any court either elected or appointed, and any elected or
appointed municipal official;
(2) "State or municipal employee" means state employee, as defined
in section 5-154, and includes an employee of any quasi-public agency,
as defined in section 1-120, or any person, whether appointed or under
contract, who provides services for a [city, town or other political
subdivision of the state] municipality for which a pension is provided;
[and]
LCO No. 1431 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 249
(3) "Crime related to state or municipal office" means any of the
following criminal offenses committed by a person while serving as a
public official or state or municipal employee:
(A) The committing, aiding or abetting of an embezzlement of public
funds from the state, a municipality or a quasi-public agency;
(B) The committing, aiding or abetting of any felonious theft from the
state, including any agency of state government, a municipality or a
quasi-public agency;
(C) Bribery in connection with service as a public official or state or
municipal employee; or
(D) The committing of any felony by such person who, [wilfully and]
with the intent to [defraud] deprive a person of money or property,
knowingly realizes or obtains, or knowingly attempts to realize or
obtain, a profit, gain or advantage for himself or herself or for some
other person, through the use or attempted use of the power, rights,
privileges or duties of his or her position as a public official or state or
municipal employee;
(4) "Municipality" means any city, town or other political subdivision
of the state and includes any local or regional board of education that
receives funds from the state or a municipality;
(5) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability
company, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust or
other legal entity, including the state, a municipality or a quasi-public
agency;
(6) "Revoke" or "revocation" means to completely deprive a public
official or state or municipal employee of an otherwise vested publicly
funded retirement benefit; and
(7) "Reduce" or "reduction" means to partially deprive a public official
or state or municipal employee of an otherwise vested publicly funded
LCO No. 1431 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 249
retirement benefit by a fixed percentage for the duration of the receipt
of the publicly funded retirement benefit.
Sec. 2. Section 1-110a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, on or after
October 1, 2008, if any public official or state or municipal employee is
convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any crime related to
state or municipal office in state criminal or federal criminal court, the
Attorney General shall apply to the Superior Court for an order to
revoke or reduce the pension of any kind to which such public official
or state or municipal employee is otherwise entitled under the general
statutes for service as a public official or state or municipal employee.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, in any civil
action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to this section on or
after July 1, 2026, the Superior Court shall presume that:
(1) Revocation of the pension is the most appropriate remedy if the
Superior Court finds that the defendant was a public official when the
defendant committed a crime related to state or municipal office; and
(2) Reduction of the pension is the most appropriate remedy if the
Superior Court finds that the defendant was a state or municipal
employee when the defendant committed a crime related to state or
municipal office.
(c) The presumptions in subsection (b) of this section may be rebutted
if a party to the civil action proves specific facts that support findings
related to the factors set forth in subsection (d) of this section.
(d) In determining whether the pension shall be revoked or reduced,
the Superior Court shall, if requested by a party in a civil action,
consider and make findings on the following factors:
(1) The severity of the crime related to state or municipal office for
LCO No. 1431 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 249
which the public official or state or municipal employee has been
convicted or to which the public official or state or municipal employee
has pled guilty or nolo contendere;
(2) The amount of monetary loss suffered by the state, a municipality
or a quasi-public agency or by any other person as a result of the crime
related to state or municipal office;
(3) The degree of public trust reposed in the public official or state or
municipal employee by virtue of the person's position as a public official
or state or municipal employee;
(4) If the crime related to state or municipal office was part of a
fraudulent scheme against the state or a municipality, the role of the
public official or state or municipal employee in the fraudulent scheme
against the state or a municipality; [and]
(5) The extent to which a remedy other than revocation or reduction
serves the interest of the state, a municipality or other victim of the crime
related to state or municipal office in obtaining restitution that has been
ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to be paid by the public
official or the state or municipal employee; and
[(5)] (6) Any such other factors as, in the judgment of the Superior
Court, justice may require, provided if the court considers the wealth,
income or economic circumstances of the public official or state or
municipal employee in rendering the court's decision, the court shall
consider the wealth, income or economic circumstances of the public
official or state or municipal employee at the time such official or
employee committed the crime related to state or municipal office, in
addition to or in lieu of the wealth, income or economic circumstances
of the public official or state or municipal employee at the time the court
renders its decision.
[(c)] (e) If the court determines, or the Attorney General certifies, that
100 a public official or state or municipal employee, who was convicted of
LCO No. 1431 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 249
101 or pled guilty or nolo contendere to a crime related to state or municipal
102 office, voluntarily provided information to the Attorney General, the
103 Auditors of Public Accounts or any state, federal or local law
104 enforcement official concerning the commission of such crime related to
105 state or municipal office by another public official or state or municipal
106 employee who had a greater degree of culpability for such crime than
107 the public official or state or municipal employee providing such
108 information, the court shall not [reduce or] revoke the pension of such
109 public official or state or municipal employee, provided such public
110 official or state or municipal employee voluntarily provided such
111 information prior to learning of a criminal investigation into such crime
112 related to state or municipal office. The court may reduce the pension of
113 such public official or state or municipal employee after considering and
114 making findings based upon the factors set forth in subsection (d) of this
115 section.
116 [(d)] (f) If the Superior Court determines that the pension of a public
117 official or state or municipal employee should be reduced, it may, after
118 taking into consideration the financial needs and resources of any
119 innocent spouse, dependents and designated beneficiaries of the public
120 official or state or municipal employee, order that some or all of the
121 reduced pension be paid to any such innocent spouse, dependent or
122 beneficiary as justice may require.
123 [(e)] (g) If the Superior Court determines that the pension of such
124 public official or state or municipal employee should not be revoked or
125 reduced, it shall order that the retirement or other benefit or payment
126 be made to such public official or state or municipal employee.
127 [(f)] (h) In all criminal proceedings in state court in which the
128 defendant is a public official or a state or municipal employee who is
129 charged with a crime related to state or municipal office, the state
130 prosecutor shall notify the Attorney General of such proceedings and
131 the Attorney General shall pursue remedies under the pension
132 revocation statute, including the possibility that any fine, restitution or
LCO No. 1431 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 249
133 other monetary order made by the court be paid from such official's or
134 employee's pension.
135 [(g)] (i) If any provision, clause or phrase of this section or of any
136 order or any action of the Attorney General hereunder is adjudged by
137 any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, or if the applicability
138 thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such judgment
139 shall not invalidate the remainder of this section or such order or action,
140 and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall
141 not be affected thereby.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 1-110
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 1-110a